incubator/apertium-ku-fa.ku.dix
    <pardef n="Kurdistan__np">
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>ê</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="con"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>ê</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 

      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>ek</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>ekê</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>eke</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="con"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 

      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>ên</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>an</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="con"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>ên</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 

      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>in</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>inan</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>ine</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="con"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 

      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>ê</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>an</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 

    </pardef>


    <pardef n="Tirkiy/e__np">
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>ê</l>
          <r>e<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>a</l>
          <r>e<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="con"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>ê</l>
          <r>e<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 

      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>ek</l>
          <r>e<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>ekê</l>
          <r>e<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>eke</l>
          <r>e<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="con"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 

      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>ên</l>
          <r>e<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>an</l>
          <r>e<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="con"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>ên</l>
          <r>e<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 

      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>in</l>
          <r>e<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>inan</l>
          <r>e<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>ine</l>
          <r>e<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="con"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 

      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>ê</l>
          <r>e<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>an</l>
          <r>e<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
    </pardef>



    <!-- Adjectives -->

    <pardef n="nû__adj">
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>tir</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>tirîn</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="pêwis/t__adj">
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>t</l>
          <r>t<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>tir</l>
          <r>t<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>tirîn</l>
          <r>t<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/baş__adj">
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>baş</l>
          <r>baş<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e r="LR"> 
        <p> 
          <l>baştir</l>
          <r>baş<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>çêtir</l>
          <r>baş<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>çêtirîn</l>
          <r>baş<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="miz/in__adj">
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>in</l>
          <r>in<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>tir</l>
          <r>in<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>tirîn</l>
          <r>in<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
    </pardef>

    <!-- Enclitics -->

    <pardef n="jî__enc">
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l/>
          <r><s n="enc"/><s n="emp"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/yê__enc">
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>yê</l>
          <r>yê<s n="enc"/><s n="con"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>ya</l>
          <r>yê<s n="enc"/><s n="con"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>yên</l>
          <r>yê<s n="enc"/><s n="con"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e r="LR"> 
        <p> 
          <l>ê</l>
          <r>yê<s n="enc"/><s n="con"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e r="LR"> 
        <p> 
          <l>a</l>
          <r>yê<s n="enc"/><s n="con"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e r="LR"> 
        <p> 
          <l>ên</l>
          <r>yê<s n="enc"/><s n="con"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 

    </pardef>

    <e lm="yê"><i/><par n="/yê__enc"/></e>
    <e lm="jî"><i>jî</i><par n="jî__enc"/></e>
    <e lm="nû"><i>nû</i><par n="nû__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="biçûk"><i>biçûk</i><par n="nû__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="bêh"><i>bêh</i><par n="nû__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="sor"><i>sor</i><par n="nû__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="nizim"><i>nizim</i><par n="nû__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="bilind"><i>bilind</i><par n="nû__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="belek"><i>belek</i><par n="nû__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="bedew"><i>bedew</i><par n="nû__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="azad"><i>azad</i><par n="nû__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="pêwist"><i>pêwis</i><par n="pêwis/t__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="xurt"><i>xur</i><par n="pêwis/t__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="mizin"><i>miz</i><par n="miz/in__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="baş"><i/><par n="/baş__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="Kurdistan"><i>Kurdistan</i><par n="Kurdistan__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Îngilistan"><i>Îngilistan</i><par n="Kurdistan__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Swêd"><i>Swêd</i><par n="Kurdistan__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Siwîs"><i>Siwîs</i><par n="Kurdistan__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Hindistan"><i>Hindistan</i><par n="Kurdistan__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Iraq"><i>Iraq</i><par n="Kurdistan__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Îran"><i>Îran</i><par n="Kurdistan__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Norwêc"><i>Norwêc</i><par n="Kurdistan__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Çîn"><i>Çîn</i><par n="Kurdistan__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Tirkiye"><i>Tirkiy</i><par n="Tirkiy/e__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Tirkîye"><p><l>Tirkîy</l><r>Tirkiy</r></p><par n="Tirkiy/e__np"/></e>
    <e lm="kurt"><i>kur</i><par n="pêwis/t__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="rast"><i>ras</i><par n="pêwis/t__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="sist"><i>sis</i><par n="pêwis/t__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="zehmet"><i>zehme</i><par n="pêwis/t__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="berfireh"><i>berfireh</i><par n="nû__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="bihêz"><i>bihêz</i><par n="nû__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="biçûk"><i>biçûk</i><par n="nû__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="dereng"><i>dereng</i><par n="nû__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="dijwar"><i>dijwar</i><par n="nû__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="dirêj"><i>dirêj</i><par n="nû__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="dûr"><i>dûr</i><par n="nû__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="giran"><i>giran</i><par n="nû__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="girîng"><i>girîng</i><par n="nû__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="hêsan"><i>hêsan</i><par n="nû__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="jor"><i>jor</i><par n="nû__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="kevn"><i>kevn</i><par n="nû__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="kêm"><i>kêm</i><par n="nû__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="kûr"><i>kûr</i><par n="nû__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="lawaz"><i>lawaz</i><par n="nû__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="nêzîk"><i>nêzîk</i><par n="nû__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="nûjen"><i>nûjen</i><par n="nû__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="pir"><i>pir</i><par n="nû__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="pêşketî"><i>pêşketî</i><par n="nû__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="pîroz"><i>pîroz</i><par n="nû__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="qalind"><i>qalind</i><par n="nû__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="qelew"><i>qelew</i><par n="nû__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="qirêj"><i>qirêj</i><par n="nû__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="reben"><i>reben</i><par n="nû__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="rind"><i>rind</i><par n="nû__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ronî"><i>ronî</i><par n="nû__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="sar"><i>sar</i><par n="nû__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="teng"><i>teng</i><par n="nû__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tijî"><i>tijî</i><par n="nû__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tirş"><i>tirş</i><par n="nû__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tund"><i>tund</i><par n="nû__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="têr"><i>têr</i><par n="nû__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="vala"><i>vala</i><par n="nû__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="xweş"><i>xweş</i><par n="nû__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="xweşik"><i>xweşik</i><par n="nû__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="zelal"><i>zelal</i><par n="nû__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="zêde"><i>zêde</i><par n="nû__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="zû"><i>zû</i><par n="nû__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="şîrîn"><i>şîrîn</i><par n="nû__adj"/></e>
